North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-10 Mental Health Services [Repealed]

25-10-01.
Mental health services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 208, § 1; 1965, ch. 203, § 71; 1981, ch. 486, § 12; 1987, ch. 570, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 353, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

25-10-01.1.
Unified mental health delivery system. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 266, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 353, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

25-10-02.
Psychiatric clinic. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 570, § 45.

25-10-03.
Mental health coordinating committee — Membership — Purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 276, § 1.

25-10-04.
Transfer of institutions under the director of institutions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 162.

25-10-05.
Mental health and retardation service units. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.